src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON JOOKSMA     ! only jooksma

                      :e IND_COND_PRS ;       ! jookseb
                      :%{W%} INFINITIVE ;     ! joosta, joostes 
             +Usage/Rare: INFINITIVE ;          ! jooksta, jookstes
                      : IMPERATIVE ;          ! jooksku
             +Usage/Rare:%{W%} IMPERATIVE ;     ! joosku
                      : NU ;                  ! jooksnud
                      : IND_PAST_SUPINE ;     ! jooksis, jooksin, jooksma
                      :%{W%} IMPERS ;         ! impersonal forms joostakse, ... 
             +Usage/Rare: IMPERS ;              ! impersonal forms jookstakse,...


! ---------------
! 17 exceptional words of types 37, 38, all ending in VV

LEXICON KEEMA   ! VVS 37   laama, keema, leema, naima, võima, näima

                      : VV_COMMON ;
                      : INFINITIVE ;         ! keeda
                      : IND_PAST ;           ! kees
                      :%>d IMPERS_AKSE ;    ! keedakse

LEXICON SAAMA !!= @CODE@ is a lexicon for saama-type words. ! VVS 37   saama, jääma

                      : VV_COMMON ;
                      : INFINITIVE ;         ! saada
                      : IND_PAST_I ;         ! sai
                      :%>d IMPERS_AKSE ;    ! saadakse

LEXICON VIIMA     ! VVS 38   viima, käima, pooma, müüma

                      : VV_COMMON ;
                      :%> A_INFINITIVE ;     ! viia
                      :%{W%}%> IMPERS_AKSE ;   ! viiakse
        +Usage/NotNorm:%>d IMPERS_AKSE ;         ! viidakse
                      : IND_PAST ;           ! viis

LEXICON TOOMA     ! VVS 38   jooma, looma, tooma, lööma, sööma

                      : VV_COMMON ;
                      :%> A_INFINITIVE ;     ! surra, süüa
                      : IND_PAST_I ;         ! jõi
                      :%{W%}%> IMPERS_AKSE ;   ! süüakse
        +Usage/NotNorm:%>d IMPERS_AKSE ;         ! söödakse
 
LEXICON VV_COMMON  ! common to all 17 words of types 37, 38 (stem ends with VV)

                      :%{W%} IND_COND_PRS ;   ! keeb, saab etc
                                              ! infinitive subparadigm -a/-da
                      :%{W%} IMPERATIVE ;     ! keegu, saagu etc
                      :%{W%} NU ;             ! keenud, saanud etc
                                              ! indicative past subparadigm -s/-i
                      : SUPINE_V ;            ! keema, saama etc
                      :%>d IMPERS_DUD ;       ! keedud
                      :»d IMPERS_DER ;        ! keedav, keedavalt, ... 
                                              ! -akse/-dakse

! ---------------

LEXICON AJAMA      ! only ajama; almost like VEDAMA

                      :a IND_COND_PRS ;      ! ajab
                      :a INF_IMP_NU ;        ! ajada, ajagu, ajanud
                      :a IND_PAST_SUPINE ;   ! ajas, ajama
                      :%{W%} IMPERS ;        ! aetud

LEXICON VEDAMA     ! VVS 28 vedama, pügama, pidama

                      :a%{W%} IND_COND_PRS ; ! veab
                      :a INF_IMP_NU ;        ! vedada, vedagu, vedanud
                      :a IND_PAST_SUPINE ;   ! vedas, vedama
                      :e%{W%} IMPERS ;       ! veetud

LEXICON PIDAMA     ! only pidama-pidi

                      :a%{W%} IND_COND_PRS ; ! peab
                      :a INF_IMP_NU ;        ! pidada, pidagu, pidanud
                      : IND_PAST_I ;         ! pidi
                      :a SUPINE_V ;          ! pidama
                      ! no impersonal forms

LEXICON TEGEMA     ! only tegema, nägema

                      :e%{W%} IND_COND_PRS ; ! teeb
                      :h%> A_INFINITIVE ;    ! teha
                      :h IMPERATIVE ;        ! tehku
                      :i NU ;                ! teinud
                      :g IND_PAST_I ;        ! tegi
                      :ge SUPINE_V ;         ! tegema
                      :h%>d IMPERS_DUD ;        ! tehtud
                      :h%{W%}%> IMPERS_AKSE ;   ! tehakse
        +Usage/NotNorm:%>hd IMPERS_AKSE ;         ! tehtakse
                      :h»d IMPERS_DER ;       ! tehtav, ... 

LEXICON PESEMA    ! only pesema

                      :%{W%} IND_COND_PRS ;   ! peseb
                      : INF_IMP_NU ;          ! pesta, pesku, pesnud
                      : IND_PAST_I ;          ! pesi
                      :e SUPINE_V ;           ! pesema
                      : IMPERS ;              ! pestud

LEXICON KUSEMA    ! only kusema; moving towards ELAMA

                      : PESEMA ;    
          +Usage/NotNorm:e INF_IMP_NU ;         ! kuseda, kusegu, kusenud
          +Usage/NotNorm:e IND_PAST ;           ! kuses
          +Usage/NotNorm:e IMPERS ;             ! kusetud

LEXICON LASKMA    ! only laskma

                      :e%{W%} IND_COND_PRS ;  ! laseb
                      : INF_IMP_NU ;          ! lasta, lasku, lasknud
             +Usage/Rare: IND_PAST ;            ! indicative past laskis, ...
                      :%{W%} IND_PAST_I ;     ! indicative past lasi, ...
                      : SUPINE_V ;            ! laskma
                      : IMPERS ;              ! impersonal forms lastakse, ...

! ---------------
LEXICON TULEMA     ! only tulema, panema, surema

                      :e%{W%} IND_COND_PRS ; ! sureb
                      :%{dbl%}%> A_INFINITIVE ;       ! surra
                      :%{W%} IMPERATIVE ;    ! surgu
                      :%{W%} NU ;            ! surnud
                      : IND_PAST_I ;         ! suri, surin, ...
                      :e SUPINE_V ;          ! surema
                      :%{dbl%}%>d IMPERS_DUD ;        ! tuldud
                      :%{dbl%}%{W%}%> IMPERS_AKSE ;   ! tullakse
          +Usage/NotNorm:%{dbl%}%>d IMPERS_AKSE ;         ! tuldakse
                      :%{dbl%}»d IMPERS_DER ;       ! tuldav, ... 

LEXICON OLEMA    ! only olema 

   +Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2:ole%> NO_COMPOUND ;
     +Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg:ole%> NO_COMPOUND ;
         +Pers+Prs+Ind:ole SG1 ;
         +Pers+Prs+Ind:ole SG2 ;
 +Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff:on NO_COMPOUND ;
         +Pers+Prs+Ind:ole PL1 ;
         +Pers+Prs+Ind:ole PL2 ;
 +Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff:on NO_COMPOUND ;

                      :ol%{dbl%}%> A_INFINITIVE ;       ! olla
                      :ol%{W%} IMPERATIVE ;   ! olgu
                      :ol%{W%} NU ;           ! olnud
                      :ol IND_PAST_I ;        ! oli, olin, ...
                      :ole SUPINE_V ;         ! olema
             +Pers+Prs:ole%{W%}%> CONDITIONAL ;
                      :ol%{dbl%}%>d IMPERS_DUD ;        ! oldud
                      :ol%{dbl%}%{W%}%> IMPERS_AKSE ;   ! ollakse
          +Usage/NotNorm:ol%{dbl%}%>d IMPERS_AKSE ;         ! oldakse
                      :ol%{dbl%}»d IMPERS_DER ;       ! oldav, ... 

! + negative forms...
     +Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg:pole%> NO_COMPOUND ;        ! NB! it has the same categories as ole ...
+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Neg:pole%>ksin NO_COMPOUND ;
+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Neg:pole%>ksid NO_COMPOUND ;
    +Pers+Prs+Cond+Neg:pole%>ks NO_COMPOUND ;
+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Neg:pole%>ksime NO_COMPOUND ;
+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Neg:pole%>ksite NO_COMPOUND ;
+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Neg:pole%>ksid NO_COMPOUND ;
    +Pers+Prs+Quot+Neg:pole%>vat NO_COMPOUND ;
     +Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg:pol%>nud NO_COMPOUND ;
+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Neg:pol%>nuksin NO_COMPOUND ;
+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Neg:pol%>nuksid NO_COMPOUND ;
    +Pers+Prt+Cond+Neg:pol%>nuks NO_COMPOUND ;
+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Neg:pol%>nuksime NO_COMPOUND ;
+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Neg:pol%>nuksite NO_COMPOUND ;
+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Neg:pol%>nuksid NO_COMPOUND ;
    +Pers+Prt+Quot+Neg:pol%>nuvat NO_COMPOUND ;
   +Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg:pol%>da NO_COMPOUND ;  
  +Impers+Prs+Cond+Neg:pol%>daks NO_COMPOUND ;
  +Impers+Prs+Quot+Neg:pol%>davat NO_COMPOUND ;
   +Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg:pol%>dud NO_COMPOUND ;
  +Impers+Prt+Cond+Neg:pol%>duks NO_COMPOUND ;     ! almost non-attested form (by Google search) ... 
